src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON V_60MANITSWMA/EHITSEMAE !!≈ * **@CODE@** manitsõma:mani
! (1) I tegonimi:
:ts%{eõ%} Harm_Neutr_INF_mA ;
! (2) II tegonimi:
+Err/Orth: Harm_Neutr_INF_dAq ;
 GER_INE_dEn ;
:ts Harm_Neutr_INF_Aq ;

:ts%{eõ%} Harm_Neutr_ACT_PRSPRC_v ;
! (3) tekev tm aktiiv:
+Err/Orth: ACT_PRFPRC_ALL_nUq ;
:ts ACT_PRFPRC_ALL_nUq ;
! (4) Tettäv tm passiiv: CHECKME
 PSS_PRSPRC_tAv ;

+Err/Dial:%^WGStem PSS_PRFPRC_t/SG_GEN_dU ;
:ts%{eõ%}%^WGStem Harm_Neutr_KAOTAMA-PSS_PRFPRC_t ;!2023_04_04 3-syll
!:ts%{eõ%}%^WGStem PSS_PRFPRC_t/SG_GEN_dU ;
+Err/Orth:%^WGStem PSS_PRFPRC_tU_SG_NOM ;
+Err/Orth:ts%{eõ%}%^WGStem PSS_PRFPRC_tU_SG_NOM ;
:ts%{eõ%} PSS_IND_PRS_ALL_dA ;
:ts%{eõ%} PSS_IND_PRT_ALL_di ;

! (5) Olõvao 1. k maq:
! 2nd person indicative present
! 1st person plural present
! (6) Olõvao 3. k tä:
! (7) min 1. k maq: Sg1 and Pl3
! (7.2) Sg2, Pl1 and Pl2
! (8) min 3. k tä:
! (9) jus:


:ds%{eõ%} ACT_IND_PRS-SG1_ZERO ;
:ts%{eõ%} Harm_Neutr_ACT_IND_PRS_SG2_USUALLY-STRONG ;
:ts%{eõ%} ACT_IND_PRS_3_s/sEq ;

:ds%>i ACT_IND_PRT_SG1_ZERO ;
+Err/Orth:ds%>i ACT_IND_PRT_SG2_q ;
:ts ACT_IND_PRT_SG2/PL1/PL2_i_USUALLY_STRONG ;
:ds%{eõ%} ACT_IND_CONNEG ;
:ds%{eõ%} ACT_IND_CONNEGII ;
:t%{sś%} ACT_IND_PRT_SG3_APOSTROPHE ;
:tsi ACT_IND_PRT_PL3_vAq ;
:dsi ACT_IND_PRT_PL3_q ;



+Err/Dial: ACT_JUS_guq ;
:ts  ACT_JUS_kuq ;

LEXICON V_62ARGNWMA
!! argnõma:arg
!! * Yaml: **argnwma62**
:%{back%} V_62ARGNWMA/TAERKNEMAE ;
LEXICON V_62TAERKNEMAE
!! tärknemä:tärk
!! * Yaml: **taerknemae62**
:%{front%} V_62ARGNWMA/TAERKNEMAE ;

LEXICON V_62ARGNWMA/TAERKNEMAE 
! (1) I tegonimi:
:%^StrGStem%>n%{eõ%} Harm_Neutr_INF_mA ;
! (2) II tegonimi:
:%{eõ%}%^Pen%^WGStem Harm_Neutr_INF_dAq ;
:%^WGStem GER_INE_dEn ;

:%^StrGStem%>n%{eõ%} Harm_Neutr_ACT_PRSPRC_v ;
! (3) tekev tm aktiiv:
:%{eõ%}%^Pen%^WGStem ACT_PRFPRC_ALL_nUq ;
! (4) Tettäv tm passiiv: CHECKME
:%^WGStem%>%{eõ%} PSS_IND_PRS_ALL_tA ;
:%^WGStem%>%{eõ%} PSS_IND_PRT_ALL_ti ;
:%{eõ%}%^Pen%^WGStem PSS_PRSPRC_tAv ;
:%{eõ%}%^Pen%^WGStem PSS_PRFPRC_t/SG_GEN_dU ;
+Err/Dial:%{eõ%}%^Pen%^WGStem PSS_PRFPRC_tU_SG_NOM ;
! (5) Olõvao 1. k maq:
! 2nd person indicative present
! 1st person plural present
! (6) Olõvao 3. k tä:
! (7) min 1. k maq: Sg1 and Pl3
! (7.2) Sg2, Pl1 and Pl2
! (8) min 3. k tä:
! (9) jus:

:%^StrGStem%>n%{eõ%} ACT_IND_PRS-12 ;
:%^StrGStem%>n%{eõ%} ACT_IND_PRS_3_s/sEq ;

:%^StrGStem%>s ACT_IND_PRT_12_i ;
:%^StrGStem%>n%{eõ%} ACT_IND_CONNEG ;
:%^StrGStem%>n%{eõ%} ACT_IND_CONNEGII ;
:%^WGStem%>%{eõ%} ACT_IND_PRT_SG3_sJ ;
:%^StrGStem%>si ACT_IND_PRT_PL3_q/vAq ;

!: ACT_IND_PRT_PL3_vAq ;
:%{eõ%}%^Pen%^WGStem ACT_JUS_kuq ;

LEXICON V_63SWIMAMA !!≈ * **@CODE@** sõimama:sõima
! Ind.Prs.ScSg3 in -s
! vowel_harmony: back
!! * Yaml: **V-swimama63**
:%{back%} V_63SWIMAMA/XX ; 
LEXICON V_63SWIMAMA/XX !!≈ * **@CODE@** sõimama:sõima
! (1) I tegonimi:
:%^Pen%^VOWRaise%^Pen%^StrGStem Harm_Neutr_INF_mA ;

! (2) II tegonimi:
:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem Harm_Neutr_INF_dAq ;
:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem GER_INE_dEn ;
:%^Pen%^VOWRaise%^Pen%^StrGStem Harm_Neutr_ACT_PRSPRC_v ;

! (3) tekev tm aktiiv:
:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem ACT_PRFPRC_ALL_nUq ;

! (4) Tettäv tm passiiv:
:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem PSS_IND_SG1_dX/SG3_tX ;

+Err/Dial:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem PSS_PRFPRC_tU_SG_NOM ;

! (5) Olõvao 1. k maq:
:%^Pen%^VOWRaise%^Pen%^StrGStem ACT_IND_CONNEG/PRS_SG1 ;
:%^Pen%^VOWRaise%^Pen%^StrGStem ACT_IND_CONNEGII ;
! 2nd person indicative present
:%^Pen%^VOWRaise%^Pen%^StrGStem ACT_IND_PRS_SG2_t/dEq/PL2_tiq ;
! 1st person plural present
:%^Pen%^VOWRaise%^Pen%^StrGStem ACT_IND_PRS_PL1_miq ;
! (6) Olõvao 3. k tä:
:%^Pen%^VOWRaise%^Pen%^StrGStem ACT_IND_PRS_3_s/sEq ;

! (7) min 1. k maq: Sg1 and Pl3 double S?
+Err/Dial:%^Pen%^VOWRaise%^Pen%^StrGStem%^VowRM%>s%>i ACT_IND_PRT_SG1_ZERO/PL3_q ;
+Err/Dial:%^Pen%^VOWRaise%^Pen%^StrGStem%>s%>i ACT_IND_PRT_SG1_ZERO/PL3_q ;

:%^Pen%^VOWRaise%^Pen%^StrGStem%^VowRM%>ss%>i ACT_IND_PRT_SG1_ZERO ;
:%^Pen%^VOWRaise%^Pen%^WGStem%>ss%>i ACT_IND_PRT_PL3_q ;
+Err/Dial:%^Pen%^VOWRaise%^Pen%^StrGStem%>ss%>i ACT_IND_PRT_SG1_ZERO/PL3_q ;
! (7.2) Sg2, Pl1 and Pl2 double S?
+Err/Dial:%^Pen%^VOWRaise%^Pen%^StrGStem%^VowRM%>s%>i ACT_IND_PRT_SG2_t/dEq/PL1_miq/PL2_tiq ;

:%^Pen%^VOWRaise%^Pen%^StrGStem%^VowRM%>ss%>i ACT_IND_PRT_SG2_t/dEq/PL1_miq/PL2_tiq ;
! (8) min 3. k tä:
:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem%>ś ACT_IND_PRT_SG3_ZERO ;

! (9) jus:

:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem ACT_JUS_kuq ;

LEXICON V_63VISKAMA !!≈ * **@CODE@** viskama:vis%{kØ%}a
! from V_63SWIMAMA 
! Ind.Prs.ScSg3 in -s
! vowel_harmony: back
!! gradation: yes
!! * Yaml: **V-viskama63**
:%{back%} V_63VISKAMA/HINGAEMAE ;
LEXICON V_63HINGAEMAE !!≈ * **@CODE@** hingämä:hingä
! Ind.Prs.ScSg3 in -s
! vowel_harmony: front
!! gradation: no
!! * Yaml: **V-hingaemae63**
:%{front%} V_63VISKAMA/HINGAEMAE ;

LEXICON V_63VISKAMA/HINGAEMAE !!≈ * **@CODE@** viskama:viska
! (1) I tegonimi: naklama+V:na%{kg%}la
:%^Pen%^VOWRaise%^Pen%^StrGStem Harm_Neutr_INF_mA ;
! (2) II tegonimi:
:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem Harm_Neutr_INF_dAq ;
:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem GER_INE_dEn ;
:%^Pen%^VOWRaise%^Pen%^StrGStem Harm_Neutr_ACT_PRSPRC_v ;

! (3) tekev tm aktiiv:
:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem ACT_PRFPRC_ALL_nUq ;
! (4) Tettäv tm passiiv:
:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem PSS_IND_SG1_dX/2_tX/SG3_tX ;!CHECKME
:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem PSS_IND_PRS_PL3_tAsEq ;
:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem PSS_IND_PRT_PL3_diq ;
:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem PSS_IND_CONNEGII_dA ;
:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem PSS_IND_CONNEG_dA ;

+Err/Dial:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem PSS_PRFPRC_tU_SG_NOM ;
+Err/Dial+Pss+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem%>di K ; !!= * @CODE@ no    q
+Err/Dial+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem%>di K ; !!= * @CODE@ no    q
+Err/Dial+Pss+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem%>tid%{eõ%} K ; !!= * @CODE@ no    q
+Err/Dial+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem%>timi K ; !!= * @CODE@ no    q
+Err/Dial+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem%>titi K ; !!= * @CODE@ no    q
+Err/Dial+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem%>tiv%{aä%} K ; !!= * @CODE@ no    q


!! +Pss+Ind+Prt +Sg1-+Pl3, ConNeg

! (5) Olõvao 1. k maq:
:%^Pen%^VOWRaise%^Pen%^StrGStem ACT_IND_CONNEG/PRS_SG1 ;
:%^Pen%^VOWRaise%^Pen%^StrGStem ACT_IND_CONNEGII ;

! 2nd person indicative present
:%^Pen%^VOWRaise%^Pen%^StrGStem ACT_IND_PRS_SG2_t/dEq/PL2_tiq ;
! 1st person plural present
:%^Pen%^VOWRaise%^Pen%^StrGStem ACT_IND_PRS_PL1_miq ;
! (6) Olõvao 3. k tä:
:%^Pen%^VOWRaise%^Pen%^StrGStem ACT_IND_PRS_3_s/sEq ;

! (7) min 1. k maq: Sg1 and Pl3 double S?
:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^StrGStem%^VowRM%>s%>i ACT_IND_PRT_SG1_ZERO/PL3_q ;
+Err/Dial:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^StrGStem%^VowRM%>s%>i ACT_IND_PRT_PL3_vAq ;

+Err/Dial:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem%^VowRM%>ss%>i ACT_IND_PRT_SG1_ZERO/PL3_q ;
+Err/Dial:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem%^VowRM%>ss%>i ACT_IND_PRT_PL3_vAq ;

! (7.2) Sg2, Pl1 and Pl2 double S?
:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^StrGStem%^VowRM%>s%>i ACT_IND_PRT_SG2_t/dEq/PL1_miq/PL2_tiq ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^StrGStem%^VowRM%>s%>i ACT_IND_PRT_SG2_q ;

+Err/Dial:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem%^VowRM%>ss%>i ACT_IND_PRT_SG2_t/dEq/PL1_miq/PL2_tiq ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^StrGStem%^VowRM%>ss%>i ACT_IND_PRT_SG2_q ;

! (8) min 3. k tä:
:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem%>ś ACT_IND_PRT_SG3_ZERO ;
! (9) jus:

:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem ACT_JUS_kuq ;

!! THIS FAR 2016-08-27
LEXICON V_64PUHKSAMA
! puhksama:puhkas
!! * Yaml: **V-puhksama64**
:%{back%} V_64PUHKSAMA/REHKSAEMAE ;
LEXICON V_64REHKSAEMAE
! rehksämä:reh%{kØ%}ä%{sś%}
!! * Yaml: **V-rehksaemae64**
:%{front%} V_64PUHKSAMA/REHKSAEMAE ;

LEXICON V_64PUHKSAMA/REHKSAEMAE !puhksama+V:puh%{kØ%}a%{sś%}
! (1) I tegonimi: uhtsama+V:uh%{tØ%}a%{sś%}
:%^Pen%^StrGStem%^Pen%^VowRM%^NoPAL%>%{aä%} Harm_Neutr_INF_mA ;

!reh{kØ}ä{sś}{front}^Pen^StrGStem^Pen^VowRM^NoPAL>{aä}>m{aä}
! (2) II tegonimi:
:%^Pen%^WGStem%^NoPAL Harm_Neutr_INF_tAq ;
:%^Pen%^WGStem%^NoPAL GER_INE_tEn ;

:%^Pen%^StrGStem%^Pen%^VowRM%^NoPAL%>%{aä%} Harm_Neutr_ACT_PRSPRC_v ;
! (3) tekev tm aktiiv: 
:%^Pen%^WGStem%^NoPAL ACT_PRFPRC_ALL_nUq ;
! (4) Tettäv tm passiiv: !CHECKME
:%^Pen%^WGStem%^NoPAL PSS_PRSPRC_tAv ;
:%^Pen%^WGStem%^NoPAL PSS_PRFPRC_t/SG_GEN_dU ;
+Err/Dial:%^Pen%^WGStem%^NoPAL PSS_PRFPRC_tU_SG_NOM ;
:%^Pen%^WGStem%^NoPAL PSS_IND_PRS_ALL_tA ;
:%^Pen%^WGStem%^NoPAL PSS_IND_PRT_ALL_ti ;

! (5) Olõvao 1. k maq: 
:%^Pen%^StrGStem%^Pen%^VowRM%^NoPAL%>%{aä%} ACT_IND_CONNEG/PRS_SG1 ;
:%^Pen%^StrGStem%^Pen%^VowRM%^NoPAL%>%{aä%} ACT_IND_CONNEGII ;
! 2nd person indicative present
:%^Pen%^StrGStem%^Pen%^VowRM%^NoPAL%>%{aä%} ACT_IND_PRS_SG2_t/dEq/PL2_tiq ;
! 1st person plural present
:%^Pen%^StrGStem%^Pen%^VowRM%^NoPAL%>%{aä%} ACT_IND_PRS_PL1_miq ;
! (6) Olõvao 3. k tä:
:%^Pen%^StrGStem%^Pen%^VowRM%^NoPAL%>%{aä%} ACT_IND_PRS_3_s/sEq ;

! (7) min 1. k maq: Sg1 and Pl3
:%^Pen%^StrGStem%^Pen%^VowRM%^NoPAL%>i ACT_IND_PRT_SG1_ZERO/PL3_q ;
+Err/Dial:%^Pen%^StrGStem%^Pen%^VowRM%^NoPAL%>i ACT_IND_PRT_PL3_vAq ;
! (7.2) Sg2, Pl1 and Pl2
:%^Pen%^StrGStem%^Pen%^VowRM%^NoPAL%>i ACT_IND_PRT_SG2_t/dEq/PL1_miq/PL2_tiq ;
! (8) min 3. k tä: 
:%^Pen%^WGStem%^PAL ACT_IND_PRT_SG3_ZERO ;
+Err/Orth-no-pal:%^Pen%^WGStem%^NoPAL ACT_IND_PRT_SG3_ZERO ;
! (9) jus: 

:%^Pen%^WGStem%^NoPAL ACT_JUS_kuq ;

!LEXICON V_65SIBAHAMA !!≈ * __@CODE@__ >>88SIBAMA >>SIBAMA
!
!+WORK: # ;



LEXICON V_67HARINWMA !!≈ * **@CODE@** harinõma:hari
!! * Yaml: **harinwma66,harinwma67 =>harinwma**
:%{back%} V_67HARINWMA/NAEGUENEMAE ;
LEXICON V_67NAEGUENEMAE !!≈ * **@CODE@** nägünemä:nägü
!! * Yaml: **harinwma66,harinwma67 =>harinwma**
:%{front%} V_67HARINWMA/NAEGUENEMAE ;

LEXICON V_67HARINWMA/NAEGUENEMAE !!≈ * **@CODE@** harinõma:hari
! (1) I tegonimi:
:%^Pen%^StrGStem%>n%{eõ%} Harm_Neutr_INF_mA ;
! (2) II tegonimi:
+Err/Dial:%^Pen%^StrGStem Harm_Neutr_INF_dAq ;
:%^Pen%^StrGStem GER_INE_dEn ;
:%^Pen%^StrGStem%>n%{eõ%} Harm_Neutr_INF_dAq ;
!+Err/Orth:n%{eõ%} Harm_Neutr_INF_dAq ;

:%^Pen%^StrGStem%>n%{eõ%} Harm_Neutr_ACT_PRSPRC_v ;
! (3) tekev tm aktiiv:
:%^Pen%^StrGStem ACT_PRFPRC_ALL_nUq ;
! (4) Tettäv tm passiiv: CHECKME
:%^Pen%^StrGStem%>n%{eõ%} PSS_IND_PRS_ALL_dA ;
:%^Pen%^StrGStem%>n%{eõ%} PSS_IND_PRT_ALL_di ;
:%^Pen%^StrGStem PSS_PRSPRC_tAv ;
+Err/Dial:%^Pen%^WGStem PSS_PRFPRC_t/SG_GEN_dU ;
:%^Pen%^WGStem%>n%{eõ%} PSS_PRFPRC_t/SG_GEN_dU ;
+Err/Dial:%^Pen%^WGStem PSS_PRFPRC_tU_SG_NOM ;
+Err/Dial:%^Pen%^WGStem%>n%{eõ%} PSS_PRFPRC_tU_SG_NOM ;
! (5) Olõvao 1. k maq:
! 2nd person indicative present
! 1st person plural present
! (6) Olõvao 3. k tä:
! (7) min 1. k maq: Sg1 and Pl3
! (7.2) Sg2, Pl1 and Pl2
! (8) min 3. k tä:
! (9) jus:

:%^Pen%^StrGStem%>n%{eõ%} ACT_IND_PRS-12 ;
:%^Pen%^StrGStem%>n%{eõ%} ACT_IND_PRS_3_s/sEq ;

:%^Pen%^StrGStem ACT_IND_PRT_SG1_si/SG2_siq/PL1_simiq/PL2_sitiq ;
:%^Pen%^StrGStem%>n%{eõ%} ACT_IND_CONNEG ;
:%^Pen%^StrGStem%>n%{eõ%} ACT_IND_CONNEGII ;
:%^Pen%^StrGStem ACT_IND_PRT-SC3_si ;
!:%>i ACT_IND_PRT_PL3_q/vAq ;

:%^Pen%^StrGStem%>n%{eõ%} ACT_JUS_guq ;

!LEXICON V_HARINWMA
!+WORK: # ;

LEXICON V_68HARKUMA
!! * Yaml: **V-harkuma68**
:%{back%} V_68HARKUMA/NAELGUEMAE ;
LEXICON V_68NAELGUEMAE
!! * Yaml: **V-naelguemae68**
:%{front%} V_68HARKUMA/NAELGUEMAE ;
